Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 2. TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE

SUBTITLE A. ADMINISTRATION OF THE TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE

CHAPTER 30. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 30.001. PURPOSE OF TITLES 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, AND 20. (a) This title and Titles 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, and 20 are enacted as a part of the state's continuing statutory revision program, begun by the Texas Legislative Council in 1963 as directed by the legislature in the law codified as Section 323.007, Government Code. The program contemplates a topic-by-topic revision of the state's general and permanent statute law without substantive change.

(b) Consistent with the objectives of the statutory revision program, the purpose of this title and Titles 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, and 20 is to make the law encompassed by the titles more accessible and understandable by:

(1) rearranging the statutes into a more logical order;

(2) employing a format and numbering system designed to facilitate citation of the law and to accommodate future expansion of the law;

(3) eliminating repealed, duplicative, unconstitutional, expired, executed, and other ineffective provisions; and

(4) restating the law in modern American English to the greatest extent possible.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 17, eff. June 1, 2003; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 11.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 9, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 10, eff. April 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1A.001, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.002. CONSTRUCTION. Except as provided by Section 30.003 and as otherwise expressly provided in this code, Chapter 311, Government Code (Code Construction Act), applies to the construction of each provision in this title and in Titles 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, and 20.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 17, eff. June 1, 2003; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 11.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 9, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 10, eff. April 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1A.001, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.003. DEFINITION OF PERSON. The definition of "person" assigned by Section 311.005, Government Code, does not apply to any provision in this title or in Title 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, or 20.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 17, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 11.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 9, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 10, eff. April 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1A.001, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.004. REFERENCE IN LAW TO STATUTE REVISED BY TITLE 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, OR 20. A reference in a law to a statute or a part of a statute revised by this title or by Title 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, or 20 is considered to be a reference to the part of this code that revises that statute or part of that statute.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 17, eff. June 1, 2003; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 11.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 9, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 10, eff. April 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1A.001, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 30.005. PREEMPTION. Unless expressly authorized by another statute, a municipality or county may not adopt, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, order, or rule regulating conduct in a field of regulation that is occupied by a provision of this code. An ordinance, order, or rule that violates this section is void, unenforceable, and inconsistent with this code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2127), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2023.